Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


Sections 3 through 12 of this act shall be known and may be


cited as the “Oklahoma Work Zone Safety and Contractor Protection


Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature finds that:


1. Oklahoma workers face increasing risks in roadway work zones


due to distracted and speeding motorists;


2. Automated enforcement technology is a proven method to


reduce work zone crashes and fatalities;


3. Contractors and subcontractors who establish work zones in


compliance with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices and


United States Department of Transportation standards should not be


subjected to excessive liability for crashes caused by third-party


motorists; and


4. The interests of public safety and economic fairness require


a balance of strong worker protections, effective automated


enforcement, and reasonable liability standards.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 152, as last


amended by Section 1, Chapter 314, O.S.L. 2025 (51 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 152), is amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 3221 Page 2


Section 152. As used in The Governmental Tort Claims Act:


1. “Action” means a proceeding in a court of competent


jurisdiction by which one party brings a suit against another;


2. “Agency” means any board, commission, committee, department


or other instrumentality or entity designated to act in behalf of


the state or a political subdivision;


3. “Charitable health care provider” means a person who is


licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this


state to administer health care in the ordinary course of business


or the practice of a profession and who provides care to a medically


indigent person, as defined in paragraph 9 of this section, with no


expectation of or acceptance of compensation of any kind;


4. “Claim” means any written demand presented by a claimant or


the claimant’s authorized representative in accordance with The


Governmental Tort Claims Act to recover money from the state or


political subdivision as compensation for an act or omission of a


political subdivision or the state or an employee;


5. “Claimant” means the person or the person’s authorized


representative who files notice of a claim in accordance with The


Governmental Tort Claims Act. Only the following persons and no


others may be claimants:


a. any person holding an interest in real or personal


property which suffers a loss, provided that the claim


of the person shall be aggregated with claims of all

Req. No. 3221 Page 3


other persons holding an interest in the property and


the claims of all other persons which are derivative


of the loss, and that multiple claimants shall be


considered a single claimant,


b. the individual actually involved in the accident or


occurrence who suffers a loss, provided that the


individual shall aggregate in the claim the losses of


all other persons which are derivative of the loss, or


c. in the case of death, an administrator, special


administrator or a personal representative who shall


aggregate in the claim all losses of all persons which


are derivative of the death;


6. “Community health care provider” means:


a. a health care provider who volunteers services at a


community health center that has been deemed by the


U.S. United States Department of Health and Human


Services as a federally qualified health center


Federally Qualified Health Center as defined by 42


U.S.C., Section 1396d(l)(2)(B),


b. a health provider who provides services to an


organization that has been deemed a federally


qualified look-alike community health center, and


c. a health care provider who provides services to a


community health center that has made application to

Req. No. 3221 Page 4


the U.S. United States Department of Health and Human


Services for approval and deeming as a federally


qualified look-alike community health center in


compliance with federal application guidance, and has


received comments from the U.S. United States


Department of Health and Human Services as to the


status of such application with the established intent


of resubmitting a modified application, or, if denied,


a new application, no later than six (6) months from


the date of the official notification from the U.S.


United States Department of Health and Human Services


requiring resubmission of a new application;


7. “Employee” means any person who is authorized to act in


behalf of a political subdivision or the state whether that person


is acting on a permanent or temporary basis, with or without being


compensated or on a full-time or part-time basis.


a. Employee also includes:


(1) all elected or appointed officers, members of


governing bodies and other persons designated to


act for an agency or political subdivision, but


the term does not mean a person or other legal


entity while acting in the capacity of an


independent contractor or an employee of an


independent contractor,

Req. No. 3221 Page 5


(2) from September 1, 1991, through June 30, 1996,


licensed physicians, licensed osteopathic


physicians and Certified Nurse-Midwives providing


prenatal, delivery or infant care services to


State Department of Health clients pursuant to a


contract entered into with the State Department


of Health in accordance with paragraph 3 of


subsection C of Section 1-106 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes but only insofar as services


authorized by and in conformity with the terms of


the contract and the requirements of Section 1-


233 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


(3) any volunteer, full-time or part-time firefighter


firefighters when performing duties for a fire


department provided for in subparagraph j of


paragraph 12 of this section.


b. For the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act,


the following are employees of this state, regardless


of the place in this state where duties as employees


are performed:


(1) physicians acting in an administrative capacity,


(2) resident physicians and resident interns


participating in a graduate medical education


program of the University of Oklahoma Health

Req. No. 3221 Page 6


Sciences Center, the Oklahoma State University


College of Osteopathic Medicine, a public trust


created pursuant to Section 3224 of Title 63 of


the Oklahoma Statutes and any sole member not-


for-profit corporation of the public trust and


any sole member not-for-profit subsidiary of such


corporation, or the Department of Mental Health


and Substance Abuse Services,


(3) faculty members and staff of the University of


Oklahoma Health Sciences Center, the Oklahoma


State University College of Osteopathic Medicine,


or a public trust created pursuant to Section


3224 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes and any


sole member not-for-profit corporation of the


public trust and any sole member not-for-profit


subsidiary of such corporation, while engaged in


teaching duties,


(4) physicians who practice medicine or act in an


administrative capacity as an employee of an


agency of this state,


(5) physicians who provide medical care to inmates


pursuant to a contract with the Department of


Corrections,



Req. No. 3221 Page 7


(6) any person who is licensed to practice medicine


pursuant to Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


who is under an administrative professional


services contract with the Oklahoma Health Care


Authority under the auspices of the Oklahoma


Health Care Authority Chief Medical Officer, and


who is limited to performing administrative


duties such as professional guidance for medical


reviews, reimbursement rates, service


utilization, health care delivery and benefit


design for the Oklahoma Health Care Authority,


only while acting within the scope of such


contract,


(7) licensed medical professionals under contract


with city, county, or state entities who provide


medical care to inmates or detainees in the


custody or control of law enforcement agencies,


(8) licensed mental health professionals as defined


in Sections 1-103 and 5-502 of Title 43A of the


Oklahoma Statutes, who are conducting initial


examinations of individuals for the purpose of


determining whether an individual meets the


criteria for emergency detention as part of a



Req. No. 3221 Page 8


contract with the Department of Mental Health and


Substance Abuse Services, and


(9) licensed mental health professionals as defined


in Sections 1-103 and 5-502 of Title 43A of the


Oklahoma Statutes, who are providing mental


health or substance abuse treatment services


under a professional services contract with the


Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse


Services and are providing such treatment


services at a state-operated facility.


Physician faculty members and physician staff of the


University of Oklahoma Health Sciences Center, the


Oklahoma State University College of Osteopathic


Medicine, or a public trust created pursuant to


Section 3224 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes and


any sole member not-for-profit corporation of the


public trust and any sole member not-for-profit


subsidiary of such corporation not acting in an


administrative capacity or engaged in teaching duties


are not employees or agents of the state.


c. For the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act,


employee shall include independent contractors and


employees of independent contractors while actively


engaged in the transport of individuals in need of

Req. No. 3221 Page 9


initial assessment, emergency detention, or protective


custody as authorized by Section 1-110 of Title 43A of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


d. Except as provided in subparagraph b of this


paragraph, in no event shall the state be held liable


for the tortious conduct of any physician, resident


physician or intern while practicing medicine or


providing medical treatment to patients.


e. For purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act,


members of the state military forces on state active


duty orders or on Title 32 active duty orders are


employees of this state, regardless of the place,


within or outside this state, where their duties as


employees are performed;.


f. For the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act,


employee shall include contractors, subcontractors,


and employees of such for the purposes of civil


actions arising out of roadway work zone operations


performed under contract with the Department of


Transportation or a political subdivision of this


state, as provided in Section 10 of this act;


8. “Loss” means death or injury to the body or rights of a


person or damage to real or personal property or rights therein;



Req. No. 3221 Page 10


9. “Medically indigent” means a person requiring medically


necessary hospital or other health care services for the person or


the dependents of the person who has no public or private third-


party coverage, and whose personal resources are insufficient to


provide for needed health care;


10. “Municipality” means any incorporated city or town, and all


institutions, agencies, or instrumentalities of a municipality;


11. “Occurrence” means a loss arising out of an accident or


event or a continuous or repeated exposure to substantially the same


general harmful conditions. All losses arising out of an accident


or event or a continuous or repeated exposure to substantially the


same general harmful conditions shall be deemed to have arisen out


of one occurrence;


12. “Political subdivision” means:


a. a municipality,


b. a school district, including, but not limited to, a


technology center school district established pursuant


to Section 4410, 4411, 4420 or 4420.1 of Title 70 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, or a public library as defined


pursuant to Section 1-104 of Title 65 of the Oklahoma


Statutes,


c. a county,


d. a public trust where the sole beneficiary or


beneficiaries are a city, town, school district or

Req. No. 3221 Page 11


county. For purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims


Act, a public trust shall include:


(1) a municipal hospital created pursuant to Sections


30-101 through 30-109 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, a county hospital created pursuant to


Sections 781 through 796 of Title 19 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, or is created pursuant to a


joint agreement between such governing


authorities, that is operated for the public


benefit by a public trust created pursuant to


Sections 176 through 180.4 of Title 60 of the


Oklahoma Statutes and managed by a governing


board appointed or elected by the municipality,


county, or both, who exercises control of the


hospital, subject to the approval of the


governing body of the municipality, county, or


both,


(2) a public trust created pursuant to Sections 176


through 180.4 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma


Statutes after January 1, 2009, the primary


purpose of which is to own, manage, or operate a


public acute care hospital in this state that


serves as a teaching hospital for a medical


residency program provided by a college of

Req. No. 3221 Page 12


osteopathic medicine and provides care to


indigent persons, and


(3) a corporation in which all of the capital stock


is owned, or a limited liability company in which


all of the member interest is owned, by a public


trust,


e. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, a housing authority created pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Housing Authorities Act,


f. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, corporations organized not for profit pursuant


to the provisions of the Oklahoma General Corporation


Act for the primary purpose of developing and


providing rural water supply and sewage disposal


facilities to serve rural residents,


g. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, districts formed pursuant to the Rural Water,


Sewer, Gas and Solid Waste Management Districts Act,


h. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, master conservancy districts formed pursuant to


the Conservancy Act of Oklahoma,


i. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, a fire protection district created pursuant to



Req. No. 3221 Page 13


the provisions of Section 901.1 et seq. of Title 19 of


the Oklahoma Statutes,


j. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, a benevolent or charitable corporate volunteer


or full-time fire department for an unincorporated


area created pursuant to the provisions of Section 592


et seq. of Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


k. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


an emergency services provider rendering services


pursuant to an existing contract between the emergency


services provider and the State Department of Health.


Provided, however, that the acquisition of commercial


liability insurance covering the activities of such


emergency services provider performed within this


state shall not operate as a waiver of any of the


limitations, immunities or defenses provided for


political subdivisions pursuant to the terms of The


Governmental Tort Claims Act,


l. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


a conservation district created pursuant to the


provisions of the Conservation District Act,


m. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act,


districts formed pursuant to the Oklahoma Irrigation


District Act,

Req. No. 3221 Page 14


n. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


any community action agency established pursuant to


Sections 5035 through 5040.1 of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes,


o. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


any organization that is designated as a youth


services agency, pursuant to Section 2-7-306 of Title


10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,


p. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


any judge presiding over a drug court, as defined by


Section 471.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


q. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


any child-placing agency licensed by this state to


place children in foster family homes,


r. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


a circuit engineering district created pursuant to


Section 687.1 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


s. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


a substate planning district, regional council of


government or other entity created pursuant to Section


1001 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


t. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


a regional transportation authority created pursuant


to Section 1370.7 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes

Req. No. 3221 Page 15


including its contract operator and any railroad


operating in interstate commerce that sells a property


interest or provides services to a regional


transportation authority or allows the authority to


use the property or tracks of the railroad for the


provision of public passenger rail service to the


extent claims against the contract operator or


railroad arise out of or are related to or in


connection with such property interest, services or


operation of the public passenger rail service.


Provided, the acquisition of commercial liability


insurance to cover the activities of the regional


transportation authority, contract operator or


railroad shall not operate as a waiver of any


liabilities, immunities or defenses provided pursuant


to the provisions of The Governmental Tort Claims Act,


and all their institutions, instrumentalities or agencies;


13. “Scope of employment” means performance by an employee


acting in good faith within the duties of the employee’s office or


employment or of tasks lawfully assigned by a competent authority


including the operation or use of an agency vehicle or equipment


with actual or implied consent of the supervisor of the employee,


but shall not include corruption or fraud;



Req. No. 3221 Page 16


14. “State” means the State of Oklahoma or any office,


department, agency, authority, commission, board, institution,


hospital, college, university, public trust created pursuant to


Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes of which the State of Oklahoma is


the beneficiary, or other instrumentality thereof;


15. “State active duty” shall be defined in accordance with


Section 801 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


16. “State military forces” shall be defined in accordance with


Section 801 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


17. “Title 32 active duty” shall be defined in accordance with


Section 801 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


18. “Tort” means a legal wrong, independent of contract,


involving violation of a duty imposed by general law, statute, the


Oklahoma Constitution, or otherwise, resulting in a loss to any


person, association or corporation as the proximate result of an act


or omission of a political subdivision or the state or an employee


acting within the scope of employment; provided, however, a tort


shall not include a claim for inverse condemnation.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1240 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Automated work zone speed enforcement system” means a


system using radar, lidar, or similar technology to detect vehicle

Req. No. 3221 Page 17


speed and capture an image of the vehicle’s license plate for civil


enforcement purposes;


2. “Contract documents” means all plans, specifications, and


traffic-control plans issued or approved by the Department of


Transportation or the contracting entity;


3. “Contracting entity” means any political subdivision of this


state that contracts with a contractor to provide traffic control or


roadway services;


4. “Contractor” means any prime contractor, subcontractor, or


their employees engaged in providing traffic control or roadway


services under contract with the Department of Transportation or any


political subdivision of this state;


5. “Gross negligence” means conduct that demonstrates reckless


disregard for the safety of others, beyond ordinary negligence;


6. “MUTCD” means the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices;


and


7. “Work zone” means any segment of roadway where construction,


maintenance, or utility work is being performed and is marked by


traffic control devices in accordance with MUTCD and Department of


Transportation specifications.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1241 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 3221 Page 18


A. 1. The Department of Transportation, in consultation with


the Oklahoma Highway Patrol, shall, beginning on the effective date


of this act until July 1, 2031, unless extended by an act of the


Legislature, establish a demonstration program utilizing automated


work zone speed enforcement systems in active roadway work zones.


2. Automated work zone speed enforcement systems shall:


a. operate only during active roadway work zone


operations,


b. be deployed on no fewer than five and no more than


twenty active roadway projects at any given time, with


priority for deployment given to high-speed or high-


risk work zones, as determined by the Department,


c. be accompanied by the installation of advance signage


which shall clearly inform motorists of the presence


of automated work zone speed enforcement systems, and


d. not be installed or operated on highway exit ramps.


B. 1. Each such system installed shall undergo daily self-


tests and an annual calibration by an independent laboratory


designated by the Department.


2. Images taken by such systems shall be limited to the rear


and license plate of a vehicle and shall be destroyed within one (1)


year of case resolution.


C. 1. Motorists who violate the speed limits of a roadway work


zone monitored by an automated work zone speed enforcement system

Req. No. 3221 Page 19


shall receive a citation and shall be subject to the following


penalties:


a. for a first violation, the motorist may complete a


course on work zone safety, designated by the


Department, in lieu of a fine. Any cited motorist who


fails to complete such course within thirty (30) days


of the issuance of the initial citation shall be


subject to a fine not to exceed Seventy-five Dollars


($75.00),


b. for a second violation within eighteen (18) months, a


fine not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), and


c. for third or subsequent violations within eighteen


(18) months, a fine not to exceed One Hundred Twenty-


five Dollars ($125.00).


2. An additional twenty-five-dollar late fee may be applied by


the Department if a cited motorist does not pay an assessed fine


within thirty (30) days after the receipt of a citation.


3. Violations assessed under the provisions of this subsection


shall not constitute criminal convictions, shall not result in the


assessment of points to the driving record of a motorist, and shall


not be used by insurers for rating purposes.


D. Eighty percent (80%) of the collected fines, pursuant to


subsection C of this section, shall be deposited into the Work Zone


Safety Revolving Fund, as created in Section 12 of this act. The

Req. No. 3221 Page 20


remaining twenty percent (20%) of the collected fines shall be


distributed to the municipality or county where the violation


occurred.


E. For the first thirty (30) days following the deployment of


an automated work zone speed enforcement system at a work zone,


motorists who violate the speed limits of such work zone shall


receive a written warning in lieu of the citations provided for in


subsection C of this section.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1242 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Contractors and subcontractors performing active roadway


construction, maintenance, or traffic control operations may equip


and operate flashing red and blue lamps on the rear of work vehicles


for the purpose of warning approaching motorists. Such lamps shall:


1. Be used only during active work zone operations;


2. Face rearward for visibility;


3. Not be used for traffic stops, pursuits, or law enforcement


functions; and


4. Be configured in accordance with Department of Public Safety


specifications for brightness and uniformity.


B. Nothing in this section shall be construed as granting work


vehicles equipped with such lamps emergency vehicle status.



Req. No. 3221 Page 21


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1243 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Department of Transportation and contractors may, when


necessary to protect workers and facilitate safe traffic movement,


temporarily detour traffic onto municipal or county roads.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1244 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A contractor performing traffic control services for the


Department of Transportation or a political subdivision of this


state shall not be liable for any claim of personal injury, property


damage, or death arising out of a roadway condition if, at the time


of the incident, the contractor was in compliance with approved


contract documents and applicable standards.


B. No person, including the driver or any occupant of a motor


vehicle, shall be eligible to recover monetary damages,


compensation, or awards of any kind from a contractor or


subcontractor for injuries, death, or property damage sustained in a


crash occurring within a designated work zone if the driver of such


vehicle was, at the time of the crash, under the influence of


alcohol, a controlled dangerous substance, or other intoxicating


substance, as defined in Section 1-140.1 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. The prohibition in this subsection applies regardless of

Req. No. 3221 Page 22


whether the intoxicated driver was cited, arrested, or convicted,


provided that competent evidence establishes impairment at the time


of the crash. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to


prevent any person from pursuing civil or criminal remedies against


the intoxicated driver or the driver’s estate.


C. The provisions of this subsection shall be construed


liberally in favor of protecting contractors and subcontractors who


comply with Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD) and


Department standards from liability arising from the misconduct of


third-party motorists.


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1245 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. If the Department of Transportation or a contracting entity


requests that a contractor prepare a traffic-control plan or design


documents, and such plan is reviewed and approved in writing, the


contractor shall not be liable for injury or damage arising out of


that plan’s design or layout, provided that the contractor complies


with the approved version. Such immunity shall apply whether the


contractor acts as a prime contractor or subcontractor.


B. Nothing in this act shall impose upon any contractor a duty


to investigate or identify defects in plans prepared or approved by


the Department or a contracting entity.



Req. No. 3221 Page 23


C. A contractor may install additional warning devices,


barriers, or safety measures beyond those required by contract


documents if, in the reasonable judgment of the contractor, such


additions enhance public safety. Such installation shall not affect


the immunity provided for in subsection A of this section unless


such installation is the proximate cause of injury or damage.


SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1246 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of civil actions arising out of roadway


work zone operations performed under contract with the Department of


Transportation or a political subdivision, a contractor or


subcontractor acting within the scope of such contract and in


compliance with approved contract documents and applicable standards


shall be deemed an employee of this state or the contracting


political subdivision within the meaning of The Governmental Tort


Claims Act, as provided in Section 152 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


B. When acting as such employee, as provided for in subsection


A of this section, the contractor or subcontractor shall be entitled


to the same immunities, defenses, and liability limitations as the


governmental entity for which the work is performed, including the


monetary limits for damages provided for in Section 154 of Title 51


of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 3221 Page 24


C. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant immunity


for acts or omissions constituting gross negligence, willful


misconduct, or reckless disregard for the safety of others.


SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1247 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any contract provision requiring a contractor or subcontractor


to waive the protections of this act shall be void and


unenforceable.


SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1248 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Department of Transportation to be designated the “Work Zone


Safety Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not


subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies


directed for deposit by the Department from the fines provided for


in Section 5 of this act. All monies accruing to the credit of the


fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the


Department for the purpose of improving work zone safety in this


state. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants


issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by


law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services for approval and payment.

Req. No. 3221 Page 25


SECTION 13. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 14. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3221 MSBB 1/13/2026 1:21:40 PM



































Req. No. 3221 Page 26